Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10A-133] Autism benefits and
coverage; notice; definitions. (a) Each individual or group accident and
health or sickness insurance policy issued or renewed in this State after
January 1, 2016, shall provide to the policyholder and individuals under
fourteen years of age covered under the policy coverage for the diagnosis and
treatment of autism.

(b) This section shall not apply to
disability, accident-only, medicare, medicare supplement, student accident and
health or sickness insurance, dental-only, and vision-only policies or policies
or renewals of six months or less.

(c) Every insurer shall provide written notice
to its policyholders regarding the coverage required by this section. The
notice shall be in writing and prominently positioned in any literature or
correspondence sent to policyholders and shall be transmitted to policyholders
within calendar year 2016 when annual information is made available to
policyholders or in any other mailing to policyholders, but in no case later
than December 31, 2016.

(d) Coverage for applied behavioral analysis
provided under this section shall be subject to a maximum benefit of $25,000
per year for services for children ages thirteen and under. This section shall
not be construed as limiting benefits that are otherwise available to an
individual under an accident and health or sickness insurance policy. Payments
made by an insurer on behalf of a covered individual for any care, treatment,
intervention, or service other than applied behavioral analysis shall not be
applied toward the maximum benefit established under this subsection.

(e) Coverage under this section may be subject
to copayment, deductible, and coinsurance provisions of an accident and health
or sickness insurance policy that are no less favorable than the copayment,
deductible, and coinsurance provisions for substantially all medical services
covered by the policy.

(f) Treatment for autism requests shall
include a treatment plan. Except for inpatient services, if an individual is receiving
treatment for autism, an insurer may request a review of the treatment plan for
continued authorization of coverage for treatment for autism at the insurer's
discretion.

(g) The medical necessity of treatment covered
by this section shall be determined pursuant to the policy and shall be defined
in the policy in a manner that is consistent with other services covered under
the policy. Except for inpatient services, if an individual is receiving
treatment for autism, an insurer may request a review of the medical necessity
of that treatment at the insurer's discretion.

(h) This section shall not be construed as
reducing any obligation to provide services to an individual under any publicly
funded program, an individualized family service plan, an individualized
education program, or an individualized service plan.

(i) Coverage under this section shall exclude
coverage for:

(1) Care that is custodial in nature;

(2) Services and supplies that are not clinically
appropriate;

(3) Services provided by family or household members;

(4) Treatments considered experimental; and

(5) Services provided outside of the State.

(j) Insurers shall include in their network of
approved autism service providers only those providers who have cleared state
and federal criminal background checks as determined by the insurer.

(k) If an individual has been diagnosed as
having autism meeting the diagnostic criteria described in the Diagnostic and
Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders available at the time of diagnosis, upon
publication of a more recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual
of Mental Disorders, that individual may be required to undergo repeat
evaluation to remain eligible for coverage under this section.

(l) Treatment for autism shall not be covered
pursuant to this section unless provided by an autism service provider that is
licensed by a state licensure board. If a state licensure board that licenses
providers to provide autism services is unavailable, the autism service
provider shall:

(1) Be certified by the Behavior Analyst
Certification Board, Inc.; provided that certification by the Behavior Analyst
Certification Board, Inc., shall be valid for purposes of this subsection for
no more than one year; or

(2) Meet any existing credentialing requirements
determined by the insurer.

(m) As used in this section, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:

"Applied behavior analysis" means the
design, implementation, and evaluation of environmental modifications, using
behavioral stimuli and consequences, to produce socially significant
improvement in human behavior, including the use of direct observation,
measurement, and functional analysis of the relations between environment and
behavior.

"Autism" means autism spectrum disorder
as defined by the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual
of Mental Disorders.

"Autism service provider" means any
person, entity, or group that provides treatment for autism and meets the
minimum requirements pursuant to subsection (l).

"Behavioral health treatment" means
evidence based counseling and treatment programs, including applied behavior
analysis, that are:

(1) Necessary to develop, maintain, or restore, to
the maximum extent practicable, the functioning of an individual; and

(2) Provided or supervised by an autism service
provider.

"Diagnosis of autism" means medically
necessary assessments, evaluations, or tests conducted to diagnose whether an
individual has autism.

"Pharmacy care" means medications
prescribed by a licensed physician or registered nurse practitioner and any
health-related services that are deemed medically necessary to determine the
need or effectiveness of the medications.

"Psychiatric care" means direct or
consultative services provided by a licensed psychiatrist.

"Psychological care" means direct or
consultative services provided by a licensed psychologist.

"Therapeutic care" means services
provided by licensed speech pathologists, registered occupational therapists,
licensed social workers, licensed clinical social workers, or licensed physical
therapists.

"Treatment for autism" includes the
following care prescribed or ordered for an individual diagnosed with autism by
a licensed physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, licensed clinical social
worker, or registered nurse practitioner if the care is determined to be
medically necessary:

(1) Behavioral health treatment;

(2) Pharmacy care;

(3) Psychiatric care;

(4) Psychological care; and

(5) Therapeutic care. [L 2015, c 235, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next